notebooks/resources/HFST/en_ia_morphology.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
	+N	! Noun tag
        +Sg	! Singular
        +Pl	! Plural
 	+Poss	! Possessive form

LEXICON Root
	Nouns ; ! No input, no output

!
! NOUNS start here
!

LEXICON Nouns

cat	N ;
dog	N ;

church	  N ;
kiss	  N ;

beauty	  N ;
sky	  N ;

goose	  N ;


! End of stem marker

LEXICON N
+N:^	Num ;

! Singular or plural

LEXICON Num
+Sg:0	PossWithS ;
+Pl:s	PossWithoutS ;

! Possessive endings: usually the singular is 's and the plural is '

LEXICON PossWithS
+Poss:'s     # ;
	     # ; ! No ending: no input, no output

LEXICON PossWithoutS
+Poss:'	     # ;
	     # ; ! No ending: no input, no output

END
